Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2738
Form of registration in beneficiary form.

Registration in beneficiary form may be shown by the words transfer on death or the abbreviation TOD, or by the words pay on death or the abbreviation POD, after the name of the registered owner and before the name of a beneficiary.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 24.